{"Neonatal respiratory distress syndrome": {"description": "Neonatal respiratory distress syndrome (RDS) is a problem often seen in premature babies. The condition makes it hard for the baby to breathe.", "Possible Complications": "Air or gas may build up in:The space surrounding the lungs (pneumothorax), The space in the chest between two lungs (pneumomediastinum), The area between the heart and the thin sac that surrounds the heart (pneumopericardium). Other complications may include:Bleeding into the brain (intraventricular hemorrhage of the newborn), Bleeding into the lung (pulmonary hemorrhage; sometimes associated with surfactant use), Blood clots due to an umbilical arterial catheter, Problems with lung development and growth (bronchopulmonary dysplasia), Delayed mental development and intellectual disability associated with brain damage and/or bleeding, Problems with eye development (retinopathy of prematurity) and blindness . ", "Symptoms": ["Bluish color of the skin and mucus membranes (cyanosis)", "Brief stop in breathing (apnea)", "Decreased urine output", "Grunting", "Nasal flaring", "Rapid breathing", "Shallow breathing", "Shortness of breath and grunting sounds while breathing", "Unusual breathing movement (such as drawing back of the chest muscles with breathing)"], "Exams and Tests": "The following tests are used to detect the condition:Blood gas analysis -- shows low oxygen and excess acid in the body fluids, Chest x-ray -- shows a \"ground glass\" appearance to the lungs that is typical of the disease. This often develops 6 to 12 hours after birth., Lab tests \u2013 rule out infection as a cause of breathing problems. ", "Treatment": "Babies that are premature or high risk for the problem need to be treated at birth by a medical team that specializes in newborn breathing problems.Giving artificial surfactant to an infant has been shown to be helpful. More research still needs to be done on which babies should get this treatment and how much of the substance to use.Infants will be given warm, moist oxygen. However, this treatment needs to be monitored carefully to avoid side effects from too much oxygen.A breathing machine can be lifesaving for some babies. Breathing machines can damage the lung tissue so use should be avoided when possible. Babies may need to use a breathing machine if they have:High levels of carbon dioxide in the arteries, Low blood oxygen in the arteries, Low blood pH (acidity), Repeated pauses in breathing\u00a0 . A treatment called continuous positive airway pressure (CPAP) may prevent the need for a breathing machine in many babies. CPAP uses a device that sends air into the nose to help keep the airways open.Babies with RDS need close care. This includes:Having a calm setting, Gentle handling, Staying at an ideal body temperature, Carefully managing fluids and nutrition, Treating infections right away . ", "Causes": "Neonatal RDS occurs in infants whose lungs have not yet fully developed.The disease is mainly caused by a lack of a slippery substance in the lungs called surfactant. This substance helps the lungs fill with air and keeps the air sacs from deflating. Surfactant is present when the lungs are fully developed.Neonatal RDS can also be due to\u00a0genetic problems with lung development.Most cases of RDS occur in babies born before 37 weeks. The less the lungs are developed, the higher the chance of RDS after birth. The problem is uncommon in babies born full-term (at 40 weeks).Other factors that can increase the risk of RDS include:A brother or sister who had RDS, Diabetes in the mother, Cesarean delivery or induction of labor before the is full-term, Problems with delivery that reduce blood flow to the baby, Multiple pregnancy (twins or more), Rapid labor . ", "Prevention": "Taking steps to prevent premature birth can help prevent neonatal RDS. Good prenatal care and regular checkups beginning as soon as a woman discovers she is pregnant can help avoid premature birth.The risk of RDS can also be lessened by the proper timing of a Cesarean delivery if needed. A lab test can be done before delivery to check the readiness of the baby\u2019s lungs. When possible, the delivery should be delayed until tests show that the baby\u2019s lungs have matured.Medicines called corticosteroids may help speed up lung maturity in the developing baby. They are often given to pregnant women between 24 and 34 weeks of pregnancy who seem likely to deliver in the next week.\u00a0At times it may be possible to give other medicines to delay labor and delivery until the steroid medication has time to work.This treatment may cut down on the risks from RDS. It may also help prevent other complications from early delivery. However, it will not totally remove the risks."}, "Noonan syndrome": {"description": "Noonan syndrome is a disease that can be passed down through families (inherited). It causes many parts of the body to develop abnormally.", "Possible Complications": "Buildup of fluid in tissues of body (lymphedema, cystic hygroma), Failure to thrive in infants, Low self-esteem, Infertility in males if both testes are undescended, Problems with the structure of the heart, Short height, Social problems due to physical symptoms . ", "Symptoms": ["Delayed puberty", "Down-slanting or wide-set eyes", "Hearing loss (varies)", "Low-set or abnormally shaped ears", "Mild intellectual disability (only in about 25% of cases)", "Sagging eyelids (ptosis)", "Short stature", "Small penis", "Undescended testicles", "Unusual chest shape (usually a sunken chest called pectus excavatum)", "Webbed and short-appearing neck "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. This may show signs of heart problems the infant had from birth. These may include pulmonary stenosis and atrial septal defect.Tests depend on the symptoms, but may include:Platelet count, Blood clotting factor test, EKG, chest x-ray, or echocardiogram, Hearing tests, Growth hormone levels . Genetic testing can help diagnose this syndrome.", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment. Your doctor will suggest treatment to relieve or manage symptoms. Growth hormone has been used successfully to treat short height in some persons with Noonan syndrome.", "Causes": "Noonan syndrome is linked to defects in several genes. Certain proteins involved in growth and development become overactive as a result of these gene changes.Noonan syndrome is an autosomal dominant condition. This means only one parent has to pass down the nonworking gene for the child to have the syndrome. However, some cases may not be inherited.", "Prevention": "Couples with a family history of Noonan syndrome may want to consider genetic counseling before having children."}, "Near drowning": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal distention", "Bluish skin of the face, especially around the lips", "Chest pain", "Cold skin and pale appearance", "Confusion", "Cough with pink, frothy sputum", "Irritability", "Lethargy", "No breathing", "Restlessness", "Shallow or gasping respirations", "Unconsciousness", "Vomiting"], "Causes": "Attempted suicide, Blows to the head or seizures while in the water, Drinking alcohol while boating or swimming, Falling through thin ice, Inability to swim or panicking while swimming, Leaving small children unattended around bathtubs and pools. ", "description": "If a person has been rescued from a near-drowning situation, quick first aid and medical attention are very important.", "Prevention": "Some tips to help prevent near-drowing are: Avoid drinking alcohol whenever swimming or boating., Drowning can occur in any container of water. Do not leave any standing water (in basins, buckets, ice chests, kiddy pools, or bathtubs) in areas where a young child can get it. , Secure the toilet seat cover with a child safety device., Fence all pools and spas. Secure all the doors to the outside, and install pool and door alarms., If your child is missing, check the pool immediately., Never allow children to swim alone or unsupervised regardless of their ability to swim., Never leave children alone for any period of time or let them leave your line of sight around any pool or body of water. Drownings have occurred when parents left \"for just a minute\" to answer the phone or door., Observe water safety rules., Take a water safety course.. "}, "Necrotizing enterocolitis": {"description": "Necrotizing enterocolitis is the death of tissue in the intestine. It occurs most often in premature or sick babies.", "Possible Complications": "Intestinal perforation, Intestinal stricture, Peritonitis, Sepsis. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal bloating", "Blood in the stool", "Diarrhea", "Feeding problems", "Lack of energy", "Unstable body temperature", "Vomiting "], "Exams and Tests": "Abdominal x-ray, Stool for occult blood test (guaiac)\r\n, Elevated white blood cell count in a CBC, Thrombocytopenia (low platelet count)\r\n, Lactic acidosis. ", "Treatment": "Treatment for a baby that may have necrotizing entercolis include:Halting regular feedings, Relieving gas in the bowel by inserting a tube in the stomach, Giving IV fluids and antibiotic medicines, Monitoring the condition with abdominal x-rays, blood tests, and measurement of blood gases . The infant will need surgery if there is a hole in the intestines or inflammation of the abdominal wall (peritonitis).In this surgery, the doctor will:Remove dead bowel tissue, Perform a colostomy or ileostomy. The bowel is reconnected after several weeks or months when the infection has healed ", "Causes": "Necrotizing enterocolitis occurs when the lining of the intestinal wall dies and the tissue falls off. The exact cause of this disorder is unknown. It is thought, however, that a drop in blood flow to the bowel keeps the bowel from producing mucus. The mucus protects the gastrointestinal tract. Bacteria in the intestine may also be a cause.Most of the time, this problem develops in an infant that is ill or premature. It is likely to occur while the infant is still in the hospital.Babies at higher risk of the condition include:Premature infants, Infants who are fed concentrated formulas, Infants in a nursery where an outbreak has occurred, Infants who have received blood exchange transfusions. "}, "Nearsightedness": {"description": "If you are nearsighted, you have trouble seeing things that are far away.", "Possible Complications": "Complications can occur in people who use contact lenses (corneal ulcers and infections), Complications of laser vision correction are uncommon, but can be serious, People with myopia can, in rare cases, develop retinal detachments or retinal degeneration. ", "Symptoms": ["Eyestrain", "Headaches (uncommon)"], "Exams and Tests": "A nearsighted person can easily read the Jaeger eye chart (the chart for near reading), but has trouble reading the Snellen eye chart (the chart for distance).A general eye examination, or standard ophthalmic exam may include:Eye pressure measurement (See: Tonometry), Refraction test, to determine the correct prescription for glasses, Retinal examination, Slit-lamp exam of the structures at the front of the eyes, Test of color vision, to look for possible color blindness, Tests of the muscles that move the eyes, Visual acuity, both at a distance (Snellen), and close up (Jaeger). ", "Treatment": "Wearing eyeglasses or contact lenses can help shift the focus of the light image directly onto the retina, producing a clearer image.The most common surgery to correct myopia is LASIK. An excimer laser is used to reshape (flatten) the cornea, shifting the focus.", "Causes": "People are able to see because the front part of the eye bends (refracts) light and focuses it on the back surface of the eye, called the retina.Nearsightedness occurs when there is a mismatch between the focusing power of the eye and the length of the eye. Light rays are focused in front of the retina, rather than directly on it. As a result, what you see is blurry. Most of the eye's focusing power comes from the cornea.Watch this video about:SeeingNearsightedness affects males and females equally. People who have a family history of nearsightedness are more likely to develop it. Most eyes with nearsightedness are healthy, but a small number of people with severe\u00a0nearsightedness develop a form of retinal degeneration.", "Prevention": "There is no way to prevent nearsightedness. Reading and watching television do not cause nearsightedness. In the past, dilating eye drops were proposed as a treatment to slow the development of nearsightedness in children, but they have never been proven effective.The use of glasses or contact lenses does not affect the normal progression of myopia -- they simply focus the light so the nearsighted person can see distant objects clearly. Hard contact lenses will sometimes hide the progression of nearsightedness, but vision will still get worse \"under\" the contact lens."}, "Nose fracture": {"Symptoms": ["Blood coming from the nose", "Bruising around the eyes", "Difficulty breathing through the nose", "Misshapen appearance (may not be obvious until the swelling goes down)", "Pain", "Swelling"], "description": "A nose fracture is a break in the bone or cartilage over the bridge, or in the sidewall or septum (structure that divides the nostrils) of the nose.", "Prevention": "Wear protective headgear while playing contact sports, or\u00a0riding bicycles, skateboards, roller skates, or rollerblades.Use seat belts and appropriate car seats when driving."}, "Narcolepsy": {"description": "Narcolepsy is a nervous system problem that causes extreme sleepiness and attacks of daytime sleep.", "Possible Complications": "Trouble functioning at work, Trouble being in social situations, Injuries and accidents, if attacks occur during activities, Side effects of medicines used to treat the disorder. ", "Symptoms": ["You may feel a strong urge to sleep, often followed by a period of sleep. You can't control when you fall asleep. This is called a sleep attack.", "These periods can last from a few seconds to a few minutes.", "They may happen after eating, while talking to someone, or during other situations.", "Most often, you wake up feeling refreshed.", "Attacks can occur while you are driving or doing other activities where falling asleep can be dangerous. ", "During these attacks, you can't control your muscles and can't move. Strong emotions, such as laughter or anger, can trigger cataplexy.", "Attacks often last from 30 seconds to 2 minutes. You remain aware during the attack.", "During the attack, your head falls forward, your jaw will drop, and your knees may buckle.", "In severe cases, you may fall and stay paralyzed for as long as several minutes. ", "You see or hear things that aren't there, either as you fall asleep or when you wake up.", "During hallucinations, you may feel afraid or under attack. ", "This is when you can't move your body as you start falling asleep or when you first wake up.", "It may last up to 15 minutes. "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will do a physical exam.You may have a blood test to rule out other conditions that can cause similar symptoms. These include:Insomnia and other sleep disorders, Restless leg syndrome, Seizures, Sleep apnea, Other medical, psychiatric, or nervous system diseases. You may have other tests, including:ECG (measures the electrical activity of your heart), EEG (measures the electrical activity of your brain), Sleep study (polysomnogram), Multiple Sleep Latency Test (MSLT). This is a test to see how long it takes you to fall asleep during a daytime nap. People with narcolepsy fall asleep much faster than people without the condition., Genetic testing to look for the narcolepsy gene. . ", "Treatment": "There is no cure for narcolepsy. However, treatment can help control symptoms.LIFESTYLE CHANGESCertain changes can help improve your sleep at night and ease daytime sleepiness:Go to bed and wake up at the same time every day., Keep your bedroom dark and at a comfortable temperature. Make sure your bed and pillows are comfortable., Avoid caffeine, alcohol, and heavy meals several hours before bedtime., Don't smoke., Do something relaxing, such as take a warm bath or read a book before going to sleep., Get regular exercise every day, which can help you sleep at night. Be sure you plan exercise several hours before bedtime. . These tips can help you do better at work and in social situations. Plan naps during the day when you typically feel tired. This helps control daytime sleepiness and reduces the number of unplanned sleep attacks., Tell teachers, work supervisors, and friends about your condition. You may want to print out material from the web about narcolepsy for them to read., Get counseling, if needed, to help you cope. Having narcolepsy can be stressful. . If you have narcolepsy, you may have driving restrictions. Restrictions vary from state to state.MEDICINESStimulant medicines can help you stay awake during the day., Antidepressant medicines can help reduce episodes of cataplexy, sleep paralysis, and hallucinations., Sodium oxybate (Xyrem) works well to control cataplexy. It can also help control daytime sleepiness. . These drugs may have side effects. Work with your doctor to find the treatment plan that works for you.", "Causes": "Experts aren't sure of the exact cause of narcolepsy. It may have more than one cause. Many people with narcolepsy have low levels of hypocretin (also known as orexin). This is a chemical made in the brain that helps you stay awake. In some people with narcolepsy, there are fewer of the cells that make this chemical. This may be due to an autoimmune reaction. An auto immune reaction is when the body's immune system mistakenly attacks healthy tissue. Narcolepsy can run in families. Researchers have found certain genes linked to narcolepsy.", "Prevention": "You can't prevent narcolepsy. Treatment may reduce the number of attacks. Avoid situations that trigger the condition if you are prone to attacks of narcolepsy."}, "Norpramin overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Airways and lungs \r\n\r\nBreathing difficulty, Pneumonia. ", "Breathing difficulty", "Pneumonia", "Bladder and kidneys \r\n\r\nUrinary hesitancy. ", "Urinary hesitancy", "Eyes, ears, nose, mouth, and throat \r\n\r\nBlurred vision, Dilated pupils, Dry mouth. ", "Blurred vision", "Dilated pupils", "Dry mouth", "Gastrointestinal \r\n\r\nVomiting. ", "Vomiting", "Heart and blood vessels \r\n\r\nRapid and irregular heartbeat, Low blood pressure, Shock. ", "Rapid and irregular heartbeat", "Low blood pressure", "Shock", "Nervous system \r\n\r\nComa. Convulsions, Drowsiness, Hallucinations, Muscle rigidity, Restlessness, Stupor, Uncoordinated movements. ", "Coma", "Convulsions", "Drowsiness", "Hallucinations", "Muscle rigidity", "Restlessness", "Stupor", "Uncoordinated movements"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a local poison control center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Nephrocalcinosis": {"description": "Nephrocalcinosis is a disorder in which there is too much calcium deposited in the kidneys. This condition is common in premature babies.", "Possible Complications": "Acute renal failure, Chronic renal failure, Kidney stones, Obstructive uropathy (acute or chronic, unilateral or bilateral). ", "Symptoms": ["Blood in the urine", "Fever and chills", "Nausea and vomiting", "Severe pain in the belly area, sides of the back (flank), groin, or testicles"], "Exams and Tests": "Nephrocalcinosis may be discovered when symptoms of renal insufficiency, kidney failure, obstructive uropathy, or urinary tract stones develop.Imaging tests can help diagnose this condition. Tests that may be done include:Abdominal CT scan, Ultrasound of the kidney . Other tests that may be done to diagnose and determine the severity of associated disorders include:Blood tests to check levels of calcium, phosphate, uric acid, and parathyroid hormone, Urinalysis to see crystals and check for red blood cells, 24-hour urine collection to measure acidity and levels of calcium, sodium, uric acid, oxalate, and citrate . ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to reduce symptoms and prevent more calcium from collecting in the kidneys.Treatment will involve methods to reduce abnormal levels of calcium, phosphate, and oxalate in the blood and urine.If you take medicine that causes calcium loss, your doctor will usually tell you to stop taking it. Never stop taking any medicine before talking to your doctor.Other symptoms, included kidney stones, should be treated as appropriate.", "Causes": "Any disorder that leads to high levels of calcium in the blood or urine may lead to nephrocalcinosis. In nephrocalcinosis, calcium deposits form in the kidney tissue itself. Most of the time, both kidneys are affected.Nephrocalcinosis is related to, but not the same as, kidney stones (nephrolithiasis).Conditions that can cause nephrocalcinosis include:Alport syndome, Bartter syndrome, Chronic glomerulonephritis, Familial hypomagnesemia, Medullary sponge kidney, Primary hyperoxaluria, Renal transplant rejection, Renal tubular acidosis, Renal cortical necrosis. Other possible causes of nephrocalcinosis include:Ethylene glycol toxicity, Hypercalcemia (excess calcium in the blood) due to hyperparathyroidism, Use of certain medications, such as acetazolamide, amphotericin B, and triamterene, Sarcoidosis, Tuberculosis of the kidney and infections related to AIDS, Vitamin D toxicity. ", "Prevention": "Prompt treatment of disorders that lead to nephrocalcinosis, including renal tubular acidosis, may help prevent it from developing."}, "Naphthalene poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Nausea", "Vomiting", "Diarrhea ", "Coma", "Confusion", "Convulsions", "Drowsiness", "Headache", "Increased heart rate (tachycardia)", "Low blood pressure", "Low urine output (may stop completely)", "Pain when urinating (may be blood in the urine)", "Shortness of breath", "Yellowing of skin (jaundice) "], "description": "This is for information only and is not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222. "}, "Nocardia infection": {"description": "Nocardia infection is a disorder affecting the lungs, brain, or skin. It occurs mainly in people with weakened immune systems.", "Possible Complications": "Complications of nocardial infections depend on how much of\u00a0the body is involved. Certain lung infections may lead to scarring and chronic shortness of breath., Skin infections may lead to scarring or disfigurement. , Brain abscesses may lead to loss of neurological function.. ", "Symptoms": ["Lungs (pulmonary nocardiosis): \r\n\r\nChest pain when breathing (may occur suddenly or slowly), Coughing up blood, Fevers, Night sweats, Weight loss. ", "Chest pain when breathing (may occur suddenly or slowly)", "Coughing up blood", "Fevers", "Night sweats", "Weight loss", "Brain (cerebral nocardiosis): \r\n\r\nFever, Headache, Seizures. ", "Fever", "Headache", "Seizures", "Skin: \r\n\r\nMay become chronically infected (mycetoma) and develop draining tracts, Ulcers or nodules with infection sometimes spreading along lymph nodes. ", "May become chronically infected (mycetoma) and develop draining tracts", "Ulcers or nodules with infection sometimes spreading along lymph nodes"], "Exams and Tests": "Nocardia infection should be suspected in people with lung, brain, or skin symptoms if they also have a condition or conditions that weaken the immune system.Nocardiosis is diagnosed using tests that identify the bacteria. Depending on the part of the body infected, testing may involve taking a tissue sample by:Brain biopsy, Bronchoscopy, Lung biopsy, Skin biopsy, Sputum culture. ", "Treatment": "Treatment involves antibiotic therapy (usually with sulfonamides) for 6 months to a year or longer.\u00a0 Sometimes, more than one antibiotic is given. You may also need\u00a0long-term, low-dose antibiotic therapy.Surgery may be done to drain an abscess.", "Causes": "Nocardia infection is a bacterial infection that usually starts in the lungs. It may spread to other organ systems -- most often the brain and the skin. It may also involve the kidneys, joints, heart, eyes, and bones.Nocardia bacteria are found in soil around the world. You can get the disease by inhaling contaminated dust or if soil containing nocardia bacteria gets into an open wound.You are more likely to get this\u00a0infection if you have chronic lung disease or a weakened immune system, which can occur with transplants, cancer, HIV/AIDs, and long-term use of steroids. "}, "Neuronal ceroid lipofuscinoses (NCLS)": {"description": "There are three main types of NCLS:", "Possible Complications": "Vision impairment or blindness (with the early-onset forms of the disease), Mental impairment, ranging from severe\u00a0developmental delays\u00a0at birth to dementia later in life, Rigid muscles (due to severe problems with the nerves that control muscle tone). The person may become totally dependent on others for help with daily activities.", "Symptoms": ["Abnormally increased muscle tone or spasm (myoclonus)", "Blindness or vision problems", "Dementia \r\n ", "Lack of muscle coordination", "Intellectual disability", "Movement disorder (choreoathetosis)", "Seizures \r\n ", "Unsteady\u00a0walk (ataxia)"], "Exams and Tests": "The disorder may be seen at birth, but it is usually diagnosed much later.Tests include:Autofluorescence (a light technique), EEG \r\n , Electron microscopy of a skin biopsy, Electroretinogram\r\n , Genetic testing, MRI or CT scans of the brain, Tissue biopsy \r\n . ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the type and extent of symptoms. You may need lifelong assistance and care.", "Causes": "NCLS\u00a0involves the buildup of an abnormal material called lipofuscin in the brain. NCLS is thought to be caused by problems with the brain's ability to remove and recycle proteins.Lipofuscinoses are inherited as autosomal recessive traits. ", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is recommended if your family has a known history of NCLS. Prenatal or preimplantation genetic testing may be available depending on the specific type of disease."}, "Nicotine poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal cramps", "Agitation, restlessness, or excitement", "Muscular twitching", "Breathing - rapid", "Breathing - stops", "Burning sensation in mouth", "Coma", "Confusion", "Convulsions", "Depression", "Difficulty breathing", "Drooling (increased salivation)", "Fainting", "Headache", "Heartbeat - pounding and rapid, followed by slow heart rate", "High blood pressure, which then drops", "Vomiting", "Weakness"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a local poison control center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Non-Hodgkin lymphoma": {"description": "White blood cells called lymphocytes are found in lymph tissue. They help prevent infections. Most lymphomas start in a type of white blood cell called the B lymphocyte, or B cell.", "Possible Complications": "NHL itself and its treatments can lead to health problems. These include:Autoimmune hemolytic anemia, Infection, Side effects of chemotherapy drugs . Keep following up with a doctor who knows about monitoring and preventing these complications. ", "Symptoms": ["Night sweats (soaking the bedsheets and pajamas even though the room temperature is not too hot)", "Fever and chills that come and go", "Itching", "Swollen lymph nodes in the neck, underarms, groin, or other areas", "Weight loss", "Coughing or shortness of breath if the cancer affects the thymus gland or lymph nodes in the chest, putting pressure on the windpipe (trachea) or other airways", "Abdominal pain or swelling, leading to loss of appetite, constipation, nausea, and vomiting", "Headache, concentration problems, personality changes, or seizures if the cancer affects the brain"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam and check body areas with lymph nodes to feel if they are swollen.The disease may be diagnosed after biopsy of suspected tissue, usually a lymph node biopsy.Other tests that may be done include:Blood test to check protein levels, liver function, kidney function, and uric acid level, Complete blood count (CBC), CT scans of the chest, abdomen and pelvis\r\n  , Gallium scan, PET (positron emission tomography) scan\r\n  . If tests show you have NHL, more tests will be done to see how far it has spread. This is called staging. Staging helps guide future treatment and follow-up.", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on:The specific type of lymphoma, The stage when you are first diagnosed, Your age and overall health, Symptoms, including weight loss, fever, and night sweats . You may receive chemotherapy, radiation therapy, or both. Or you may not need any immediate treatment. Your doctor can tell you more about your specific treatment.Radioimmunotherapy may be used in some cases. This involves linking a radioactive substance to an antibody that targets the cancerous cells and injecting the substance into the body.High-dose chemotherapy may be given when NHL returns after treatment or does not respond to the first treatment. This is followed by an autologous stem cell transplant (using your own stem cells) to rescue the bone marrow after the high-dose chemotherapy. With certain types of NHL, these treatment steps are used at first remission to try and achieve a cure.Blood transfusions or platelet transfusions may be required if blood counts are low. ", "Causes": "For most patients, the cause of NHL is unknown. But lymphomas may develop in people with weakened immune systems, including persons who have had an organ transplant or persons with HIV infection. NHL most often affects adults. Men develop NHL more often than women. Children can also develop some forms of NHL.There are many types of NHL. One classification (grouping) is by how fast the cancer spreads. The cancer may be low grade (slow growing), intermediate grade, or high grade (fast growing). NHL is further grouped by how the cells look under the microscope, what type of white blood cell it originates from, and whether there are certain DNA changes in the tumor cells themselves."}, "Nitroglycerin overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Shortness of breath", "Slow breathing", "Blurred vision", "Double vision", "Involuntary eye movements\u00a0", "Heart palpitations", "Low blood pressure", "Rapid heartbeat or slow heartbeat", "Convulsions", "Coma", "Confusion", "Dizziness", "Fainting", "Headache ", "Bluish color to lips and fingernails", "Cold skin", "Flushing ", "Diarrhea", "Cramping", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea and vomiting "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Keep all medications in child-proof bottles and out of the reach of children."}, "Neonatal hypothyroidism": {"description": "If the baby was born with the condition, it is called congenital hypothyroidism. If it develops soon after birth, it is called hypothyroidism acquired in the newborn period.", "Possible Complications": "Intellectual disability, Growth problems, Heart problems. ", "Symptoms": ["Dull look", "Puffy face", "Thick tongue that sticks out", "Choking episodes", "Constipation", "Dry, brittle hair", "Jaundice", "Lack of muscle tone (floppy infant)", "Low hairline ", "Poor feeding", "Short height", "Sleepiness", "Sluggishness"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam may show:Decreased muscle tone, Failure to grow, Hoarse-sounding cry or voice, Short arms and legs, Very large soft spots on the skull (fontanelles), Wide hands with short fingers, Widely separated skull bones. Blood tests\u00a0are done to check thyroid function. Other tests may include:Thyroid scan, X-ray of the long bones. ", "Treatment": "Early diagnosis is very important. Most of the effects of hypothyroidism are easy to reverse.Thyroxine is usually given to treat hypothyroidism. Once the child starts taking this medicine, blood tests are regularly done to make sure thyroid hormone levels are in a normal range.", "Causes": "Hypothyroidism in the newborn may be caused by:A missing or poorly developed thyroid gland, A pituitary gland that does not stimulate the thyroid gland, Thyroid hormones that are poorly formed or do not work. A thyroid gland that is not fully developed is the most common defect. Girls are affected twice as often as boys.", "Prevention": "If a pregnant women takes radioactive iodine for thyroid cancer, the thyroid gland may be destroyed in the developing fetus. Infants whose mothers have taken such medicines should be observed carefully after birth for signs of hypothyroidism.Most states require a routine screening test to check all newborns for hypothyroidism.\r\n"}, "Neuroblastoma": {"description": "Neuroblastoma is a malignant (cancerous) tumor that develops from nerve tissue. It usually occurs in infants and children.", "Possible Complications": "Spread (metastasis) of the tumor, Damage and loss of function of involved organ(s) . ", "Symptoms": ["Bone pain or tenderness (if the cancer has spread to the bones)", "Difficulty breathing or a chronic cough (if the cancer has spread to the chest)", "Enlarged abdomen (from a large tumor or excess fluid)", "Flushed, red skin", "Pale skin and bluish color around the eyes", "Profuse sweating", "Rapid heart rate (tachycardia) ", "Inability to empty the bladder", "Loss of movement (paralysis) of the hips, legs, or feet (lower extremities)", "Problems with balance", "Uncontrolled eye movements or leg and feet movements (called opsoclonus-myoconus syndrome, or \"dancing eyes and dancing feet\") "], "Exams and Tests": "Signs vary, depending on the location of the tumor.Examination of the abdomen with the hands (palpation) may reveal a lump or mass., The liver may be enlarged, if the tumor has spread to the liver., Adrenal gland tumors can cause high blood pressure and a fast heart rate., Lymph nodes may be swollen.. X-ray or other imaging tests are done to locate the main (primary) tumor and to see where it has spread. These include:Bone scan, Bone x-rays , Chest x-ray, CT scan of chest and abdomen, MRI scan of chest and abdomen . Other tests include:Biopsy of tumor, Bone marrow biopsy, CBC (complete blood count) showing anemia or other abnormality, Coagulation studies, erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR)\u00a0, Hormone tests (blood tests to check levels of hormones such as catecholamines), MIBG scan, Urine 24-hour test for catecholamines, homovanillic acid (HVA), and vanillymandelic acid (VMA) . ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on:Location of the tumor, How much and where the tumor has spread, The patient's age. In certain cases, surgery alone is enough. Often, though, other therapies are needed. Anticancer medicines (chemotherapy) may be recommended if the tumor has spread. Radiation therapy may also be used.High-dose chemotherapy, followed by autologous stem cell transplantation, is being studied for use in children with very high-risk tumors.", "Causes": "Neuroblastoma can occur in many areas of the body. It develops from the tissues that form the sympathetic nervous system. This is the part of the nervous system that controls body functions, such as heart rate and blood pressure, digestion, and levels of certain hormones.Most neuroblastomas begin in the abdomen in the adrenal gland or next to the spinal cord, or in the chest. Neuroblastomas can spread to the bones. These include the face, skull, pelvis, shoulders, arms, and legs. It can also spread to the bone marrow, liver, lymph nodes, skin, and around the eyes (orbits).The cause of the tumor is not known. Neuroblastoma is commonly diagnosed in children before age 5. Each year there are around 700 new cases in the United States. The disorder occurs in approximately 1 out of 100,000 children and is slightly more common in boys.In most patients, the tumor has spread when it is first diagnosed."}, "Neonatal sepsis": {"description": "Neonatal sepsis is a blood infection that occurs in an infant younger than 90 days old. Early-onset sepsis is seen in the first week of life. Occurs after 1 week and before 3 months of age. ", "Possible Complications": "Disability, Death. ", "Symptoms": ["Body temperature changes", "Breathing problems", "Diarrhea or decreased bowel movements", "Low blood sugar", "Reduced movements", "Reduced sucking", "Seizures", "Slow or fast heart rate", "Swollen belly area", "Vomiting", "Yellow skin and whites of the eyes (jaundice) "], "Exams and Tests": "Lab tests can help diagnose neonatal sepsis and identify the cause of the infection. Blood tests may include:Blood culture\r\n  , C-reactive protein\r\n  , Complete blood count (CBC)\r\n  . A lumbar puncture (spinal tap) will be done to look at the spinal fluid for bacteria. Skin, stool, and urine cultures may be done for herpes virus if the mother has a history of infection.A chest x-ray will be done if the baby has a cough or problems breathing.Urine culture tests are done in babies older than a few days. ", "Treatment": "Babies younger than 4 weeks old who have fever or other signs infection are started on intravenous (IV) antibiotics right away. (It may take 24 to 72 hours to get lab results.)The baby will get antibiotics for up to 3 weeks if bacteria are found in the blood or spinal fluid. Treatment will be shorter if no bacteria are found. An antiviral medication called acyclovir will be used for infections that may be caused by the herpes virus. Older babies who have normal lab results, and have only a fever may not be given antibiotics. Instead, the child may be able to leave the hospital and come back for checkups.Babies who need treatment and have already gone home after birth will be admitted to the hospital for monitoring.", "Causes": "Neonatal sepsis can be caused by bacteria such as Escherichia coli (E.coli), Listeria, and some strains of streptococcus. The herpes virus can also cause a severe infection in a newborn baby. Early-onset neonatal sepsis most often appears within 24 hours of birth. The baby gets the infection from the mother before or during delivery. The following increases an infant's risk of early-onset sepsis:Group B streptococcus infection during pregnancy\r\n  , Preterm delivery\r\n  , Water breaking (rupture of membranes) longer than 24 hours before birth\r\n  , Infection of the placenta tissues and amniotic fluid (chorioamnionitis)\r\n  . Babies with late-onset neonatal sepsis get infected after delivery. The following increase an infant's risk of sepsis after delivery:Having a catheter in a blood vessel for a long time\r\n  , Staying in the hospital for an extended period of time\r\n  . ", "Prevention": "Pregnant women may need preventive antibiotics if they have:Infection in the placenta, Group B strep infection, Given birth in the past to a baby with sepsis caused by bacteria. Other things that can help prevent sepsis include:Preventing and treating infections in mothers, including herpes infection, Providing a clean place for birth, Delivering the baby within 24 hours of when the membranes break. "}, "Neonatal abstinence syndrome": {"description": "Neonatal abstinence syndrome (NAS) is a group of problems that occur in a newborn who was exposed to addictive opiate drugs while in the mother\u2019s womb. ", "Possible Complications": "Drug and alcohol use during pregnancy can lead to many health problems in the baby besides NAS. These may include:Birth defects, Low birth weight, Premature birth, Small head circumference, Sudden infant death syndrome (SIDS), Problems with development and behavior. Neonatal abstinence syndrome can last from 1 week to 6 months.", "Symptoms": ["The type of drug the mother used", "How the body breaks down the drug", "How much of the drug she was taking", "How long she used the drug", "Whether the baby was born full-term or early (premature) ", "Blotchy skin coloring (mottling)", "Diarrhea", "Excessive crying or high-pitched crying", "Excessive sucking", "Fever", "Hyperactive reflexes", "Increased muscle tone", "Irritability", "Poor feeding", "Rapid breathing", "Seizures", "Sleep problems", "Slow weight gain", "Stuffy nose, sneezing", "Sweating", "Trembling (tremors)", "Vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "Many other conditions can produce the same symptoms as neonatal abstinence syndrome. To help make a diagnosis, the doctor will ask questions about the mother's drug use. The mother may\u00a0be asked\u00a0about which drugs she took during pregnancy, and when she last took them.Tests that may be done to diagnose withdrawal in a newborn include:Neonatal abstinence syndrome scoring system, which assigns points based on each symptom and its severity. The infant's score can help determine treatment., Toxicology screen of first bowel movements (meconium), Urine test (urinalysis). ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on:The drug involved, The infant's overall health, Whether the baby was born full-term or premature . The health care team will watch the newborn carefully for signs of withdrawal, feeding problems, and weight gain. Babies who vomit or who are very dehydrated may need to get fluids through a vein (IV).Infants with neonatal abstinence syndrome are often fussy and hard to calm. Tips to calm the infant down include:Gently rocking the child, Reducing noise and lights, Swaddling the baby in a blanket. Some babies with severe symptoms need medicines such as methadone and morphine to treat withdrawal symptoms.The goal of treatment is to prescribe the infant a drug similar to the one the mother used during pregnancy and slowly decrease the dose over time. This helps wean the baby off the drug and relieves some withdrawal symptoms. Breastfeeding may also be helpful.Babies with this condition often have poor feeding or slow growth. These babies may need:A higher-calorie formula that provides greater nutrition, Smaller portions given more often. ", "Causes": "Neonatal abstinence syndrome occurs because a pregnant woman takes opiate or narcotic drugs such as heroin, codeine, oxycodone (Oxycontin) methadone or buprenorphine. These and other substances pass through the placenta that connects the baby to its mother in the womb. The baby becomes addicted along with the mother.At birth, the baby is still dependent on the drug. Because the baby is no longer getting the drug after birth, symptoms of withdrawal may occur.Alcohol and other drugs use during pregnancy can also cause problems in the baby. Babies of mothers who use other addictive drugs (nicotine, amphetamines, barbiturates, cocaine, marijuana,) may have long-term problems. However, there is no clear evidence of a neonatal abstinence syndrome for these drugs. ", "Prevention": "Discuss all medications, and alcohol and tobacco use with your health care provider. If you are using drugs, including alcohol or tobacco, ask your health care provider for help with stopping as soon as possible. If you are already pregnant, talk to your health care provider about the best way to stop using and keep you and the baby safe."}, "Nephrotic syndrome": {"description": "Nephrotic syndrome is a group of symptoms that include protein in the urine, low blood protein levels, high cholesterol levels, high triglyceride levels, and swelling.", "Possible Complications": "Acute kidney failure, Atherosclerosis and related heart diseases, Chronic kidney disease, Fluid overload, congestive heart failure, pulmonary edema, Infections, including pneumococcal pneumonia, Malnutrition, Renal vein thrombosis. ", "Symptoms": ["In the face and around the eyes (facial swelling)", "In the arms and legs, especially in the feet and ankles", "In the belly area (swollen abdomen)", "Foamy appearance of the urine", "Poor appetite", "Weight gain (unintentional) from fluid retention"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam. Laboratory tests will be done to see how well the kidneys are working. They include:Albumin blood test, Blood chemistry tests such as basic metabolic panel or comprehensive metabolic panel, Blood urea nitrogen (BUN), Creatinine - blood test, Creatinine clearance - urine test, Urinalysis. Fats are often also present in the urine. Blood cholesterol and triglyceride levels may be high.A kidney biopsy may be needed to find the cause of the disorder.Tests to rule out various causes may include the following:Antinuclear antibody, Cryoglobulins, Complement levels, Glucose tolerance test, Hepatitis B and C antibodies, HIV test, Rheumatoid factor, Serum protein electrophoresis (SPEP), Syphilis serology, Urine protein electrophoresis (UPEP). This disease may also change the results of the following tests:Vitamin D level, Serum iron, Urinary casts. ", "Treatment": "The goals of treatment are to relieve symptoms, prevent complications, and delay kidney damage. To control nephrotic syndrome, you must treat the disorder that is causing it. You may need treatment for life.Treatments:Keep blood pressure at or below 130/80 mmHg to delay kidney damage. Angiotensin-converting enzyme (ACE) inhibitors or angiotensin receptor blockers (ARBs) are the medicines most often used. ACE inhibitors may also help decrease the amount of protein lost in the urine., You may take corticosteroids and other drugs that suppress or quiet the immune system., Treat high cholesterol to reduce the risk of heart and blood vessel problems. A low-fat, low-cholesterol diet is usually not very helpful for people with nephrotic syndrome. Medications to reduce cholesterol and triglycerides (usually statins) may be needed., A low-salt diet may help with swelling in the hands and legs. Water pills (diuretics) may also help with this problem., Low-protein diets may be helpful. Your health care provider may suggest eating a moderate-protein diet (1 gram of protein per kilogram of body weight per day)., You may need vitamin D supplements if nephrotic syndrome is long-term and not responding to treatment., Blood thinners may be needed to treat or prevent blood clots.. ", "Causes": "Nephrotic syndrome is caused by different disorders that damage the kidneys. This damage leads to the release of too much protein in the urine.The most common cause in children is minimal change disease. Membranous glomerulonephritis is the most common cause in adults.This condition can also occur from:Cancer, Diseases such as diabetes, systemic lupus erythematosus, multiple myeloma, and amyloidosis, Genetic disorders, Immune disorders, Infections (such as strep throat, hepatitis, or mononucleosis), Use of certain drugs. It can occur with kidney disorders such as:Focal and segmental glomerulosclerosis, Glomerulonephritis, Mesangiocapillary glomerulonephritis. Nephrotic syndrome can affect all age groups. In children, it is most common between ages 2 and 6. This disorder occurs slightly more often in males than females.", "Prevention": "Treating conditions that can cause nephrotic syndrome may help prevent the syndrome."}, "Night terror": {"description": " \r\n Night terrors (sleep terrors) are a sleep disorder in which a person quickly wakes from sleep in a terrified state.", "Symptoms": ["Children often scream and are very frightened and confused. They thrash around violently and are often not aware of their surroundings.", "The child\u00a0may not be able\u00a0to respond to being talked to, comforted, or awakened.", "The child may be sweating, breathing very fast (hyperventilating), have a fast heart rate, and widened (dilated) pupils.", "The spell may last 10\u00a0to 20 minutes, then the child goes back to sleep."], "Exams and Tests": "In many cases, no further examination or testing is needed. If the night terror is severe or prolonged, the child may need a psychological evaluation.", "Causes": "The cause is unknown, but night terrors may be triggered by:Fever, Lack of sleep, Periods of emotional tension, stress, or conflict. Night terrors are most common in children ages 3\u00a0through 7, and much less common after that. Night terrors may run in families. They can occur in adults, especially when there is emotional tension or the use of alcohol.", "Prevention": "Minimizing stress or using coping mechanisms may reduce night terrors.", "Treatment": "In many cases, a child who has a night terror only needs to be comforted.Reducing stress or using coping mechanisms may reduce night terrors. Talk therapy or counseling may be needed in some cases.Medicines\u00a0prescribed for use at bedtime will often reduce night terrors, but are rarely used to treat this disorder."}, "Nasal polyps": {"description": "Nasal polyps are soft, sac-like growths on the lining of the nose or sinuses.", "Possible Complications": "Bleeding, Infection, Polyps coming back after treatment . ", "Symptoms": ["Runny nose", "Stuffed up nose", "Sneezing", "Feeling like your nose is blocked", "Loss of smell", "Loss of taste", "Headache and pain if you also have a sinus infection "], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor will look in your nose. Polyps look like a grayish grape-shaped growth in the nasal cavity. Your doctor may do a CT scan\u00a0of your sinuses. Polyps will appear as cloudy spots. Older polyps may have broken down some of the bone inside your sinuses. ", "Treatment": "Medicines help relieve symptoms, but rarely get rid of nasal polyps.Nasal steroid sprays shrink polyps. They help clear blocked nasal passages and runny nose. Symptoms return if treatment is stopped., Corticosteroid pills or liquid may reduce swelling and other symptoms., Allergy medicines can help prevent polyps from growing back. , Antibiotics can treat a sinus infection caused by bacteria. They can't treat polyps or sinus infections caused by a virus.. If medicines don't work, or you have very large polyps, you may need surgery to remove them. Endoscopic sinus surgery is often used to treat polyps. With this procedure, your doctor uses a thin, lighted tube with instruments at the end. The tube is inserted into your nasal passages and the doctor removes the polyps. , Usually you can go home the same day., Sometimes polyps come back, even after surgery. . ", "Causes": "Nasal polyps can grow anywhere on lining of the nose or the sinuses. They often grow where the sinuses open into the nasal cavity. Small polyps may not cause any problems. Large polyps can block your sinuses or nasal airway.Nasal polyps are not cancer. They seem to grow due to long-term swelling and irritation in the nose from allergies, asthma, or infection.No one knows exactly why some people get nasal polyps. If you have any of the following conditions, you may be more likely to get nasal polyps:Aspirin sensitivity, Asthma, Chronic sinus infections, Cystic fibrosis, Hay fever. ", "Prevention": "You can't prevent nasal polyps. However, nasal sprays, antihistamines, and allergy shots may help prevent polyps that block your airway., Treating sinus infections right away also may help.. "}, "Neurodegeneration with brain iron accumulation (NBIA)": {"description": "Neurodegeneration with brain iron accumulation (formerly known as Hallervorden-Spatz disease) is a movement disorder that is passed down through families (inherited).", "Possible Complications": "Medication used to treat symptoms can cause complications. Being unable to move from the disease can lead to:Blood clots, Respiratory infections, Skin breakdown. ", "Symptoms": ["Dementia", "Difficulty speaking", "Involuntary muscle contractions (dystonia)", "Movement problems", "Muscle rigidity", "Seizures", "Tremor", "Vision loss", "Weakness", "Writhing movements "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you and ask questions about your symptoms and\u00a0medical history. The exam may show:Abnormal postures and movements, Muscle rigidity, Tremors, Weakness. Genetic tests can look for the defective gene that causes the disease. However, this test is not yet widely available. It is only found at certain research laboratories.Tests such as MRI can help rule out other movement disorders and diseases.", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for NBIA. Treatment is focused on controlling the symptoms.", "Causes": "Neurodegeneration with brain iron accumulation (NBIA) usually begins in childhood.Most cases of NBIA disease are due to a defect in a gene that makes a protein called pantothenate kinase 2. Patients with this genetic defect have a buildup of iron in parts of the brain. Several genetic causes of NBIA have now been discovered.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is appropriate in families affected by this illness. There is no known way to prevent it."}, "Nicotine and tobacco": {"Symptoms": ["Decreases the appetite (Fear of weight gain makes some people unwilling to stop smoking.)", "Boosts mood and may even relieve minor depression (Many people will feel a sense of well-being.)", "Increases activity of the intestines", "Creates more saliva and phlegm", "Increases heart rate by around 10 to 20 beats per minute", "Increases blood pressure by 5 to 10 mmHg", "May cause sweating, nausea, and diarrhea", "Stimulates memory and alertness (People who use tobacco often depend on it to help them accomplish certain tasks and perform well.)", "Intense craving for nicotine", "Anxiety", "Depression", "Drowsiness or trouble sleeping", "Bad dreams and nightmares", "Feeling tense, restless, or frustrated", "Headaches", "Increased appetite and weight gain", "Problems concentrating"], "Possible Complications": "There are many more reasons to quit using tobacco. Knowing the serious health risks from tobacco may help motivate you to quit. Tobacco and related chemicals such as tar and nicotine can increase your risk of serious health problems such as cancer, lung disease, and heart attack.", "description": "Tobacco and nicotine can be addictive like\u00a0alcohol, cocaine, and morphine.", "Causes": "Tobacco is a plant grown for its leaves, which are smoked, chewed, or sniffed.\r\nTobacco contains chemical called nicotine. Nicotine is an addictive substance.\r\n  , Tobacco also contains more than 19 known chemicals that can cause cancer. As a group, these are called \"tar.\" More than 4,000 other chemicals can be found in tobacco.\r\n  . Millions of people in the United States have been able to quit smoking. Although the number of cigarette smokers in the United States has dropped in recent years, the number of smokeless tobacco users has steadily increased. Smokeless tobacco products are either placed in the mouth, cheek, or lip and sucked or chewed on, or placed in the nasal passage. The nicotine in these products is absorbed at the same rate as smoking tobacco, and addiction is still very strong.\r\nBoth smoking and smokeless tobacco use carry many health risks.\r\n", "Treatment": "It is hard to stop smoking or using smokeless tobacco. But anyone can do it. There are many ways quit smoking.There are also resources to help you. Family members, friends, and co-workers may be supportive. Quitting tobacco is hard if you are acting alone.To be successful, you must really want to quit. Most people who have quit smoking were unsuccessful at least once in the past. Try not to view past attempts to quit as failures. See them as learning experiences.Most smokers find it hard to break all the habits they have created around smoking.A smoking cessation program may improve your chance for success. These programs are offered by hospitals, health departments, community centers, work sites, and national organizations.Nicotine replacement therapy\u00a0may also be helpful. It involves the use of products that provide low doses of nicotine, but none of the toxins found in smoke. Nicotine replacement comes in the form of gum, inhalers, throat lozenges, nasal spray, and skin patches. You can buy many types without a prescription. The goal is to relieve cravings for nicotine and ease your withdrawal symptoms.Your health care provider can also prescribe other types of medicines to help you quit and prevent you from starting again."}, "Naproxen sodium overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Eyes, ears, nose, and throat \r\n\r\nRinging in the ears, Blurred vision. ", "Ringing in the ears", "Blurred vision", "Gastrointestinal system \r\n\r\nDiarrhea, Heartburn, Nausea, Stomach pain (possible bleeding in the stomach and intestines), Vomiting. ", "Diarrhea", "Heartburn", "Nausea", "Stomach pain (possible bleeding in the stomach and intestines)", "Vomiting", "Heart and blood vessels \r\n\r\nCirculatory failure. ", "Circulatory failure", "Lungs \r\n\r\nSlow, labored breathing, Wheezing. ", "Slow, labored breathing", "Wheezing", "Nervous system \r\n\r\nAgitation, Coma, Confusion, Convulsions, Dizziness, Drowsiness, Headache - severe,  Incoherence (the person is not understandable), Movement problems, Unsteadiness. ", "Agitation", "Coma", "Confusion", "Convulsions", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Headache - severe", " Incoherence (the person is not understandable)", "Movement problems", "Unsteadiness", "Skin \r\n\r\nRash. ", "Rash"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a local poison control center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Neurogenic bladder": {"Symptoms": ["Having to urinate too often in small amounts", "Problems emptying all the urine from the bladder", "Loss of bladder control ", "Full bladder and possibly urine leakage\u00a0", "Inability to tell when the bladder is full", "Problems starting to urinate or emptying all the urine from the bladder", "Urinary retention "], "Possible Complications": "Constant urine leakage can cause skin to break down and lead to pressure sores, Kidney damage may occur if the bladder becomes too full, causing pressure to build up in the tubes leading to the kidneys and in the kidneys themselves, Urinary tract infections. ", "description": "Neurogenic bladder is a problem in which a person lacks bladder control due to a brain, spinal cord,\u00a0or nerve condition.", "Causes": "Several muscles and nerves must work together for your bladder to hold urine until you are ready to empty it. Nerve messages go back and forth between the brain and the muscles that control bladder emptying. If these nerves are damaged by illness or injury, the muscles may not be able to tighten or relax at the right time.Disorders of the central nervous system commonly cause neurogenic bladder. These can include:Alzheimer disease, Birth defects of the spinal cord, Brain or spinal cord tumors, Cerebral palsy, Encephalitis, Learning disabilities such as attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD), Multiple sclerosis, Parkinson disease, Spinal cord injury, Stroke . Damage or disorders of the nerves that supply the bladder can also cause this condition. These can include:Nerve damage\u00a0(neuropathy), Nerve damage due to long-term, heavy alcohol use, Nerve damage due to long-term diabetes, Vitamin B12 deficiency, Nerve damage from syphilis, Nerve damage due to pelvic surgery, Nerve damage from a herniated disc or spinal canal stenosis . ", "Treatment": "Medications may help manage your symptoms. Your doctor may recommend:Medicines that relax the bladder (oxybutynin, tolterodine, or propantheline), Medicines that make certain nerves more active (bethanechol), Botulinum toxin (Botox), GABA supplements, Anti-epileptic drugs . Your doctor may refer you to someone who has been trained to help people manage bladder problems. Skills or techniques you may learn include:Exercises to strengthen your pelvic floor muscles (Kegel exercises), Keeping a diary of when you urinate, the amount you urinated, and if you leaked urine. This may help you learn when you should empty your bladder and when it may be best to be near a bathroom. . Learn to recognize the symptoms of urinary infections (UTIs), such as burning when you urinate, fever, low back pain on one side, and a more frequent need to urinate. Cranberry tablets may help prevent UTIs.Some people may need to use a urinary catheter. This is a thin tube that is inserted into your bladder.You may need a catheter to be in place all the time (indwelling catheter). , You may need a catheter to be placed in your bladder 4 to 6 times a day to keep your bladder from becoming too full (intermittent catheterization). . Sometimes surgery is needed. Surgeries for neurogenic bladder include:Artificial sphincter, Electrical device implanted near the bladder nerves to stimulate the bladder muscles, Sling surgery, Creation of an opening (stoma) in which urine flows into a special pouch (this is called urinary diversion) . "}, "Niemann-Pick disease": {"description": "Each type involves different organs. It may or may not involve\u00a0the nervous system\u00a0and breathing. Each one can cause different symptoms and may occur at different times throughout life.", "Possible Complications": "Blindness, Brain damage with intellectual disability and delayed development of physical skills, Deafness, Death. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal (belly area) swelling within 3\u00a0to 6 months", "Cherry red spot in the eye", "Feeding difficulties", "Loss of early motor skills (gets worse over time) ", "Difficulty moving limbs", "Enlarged spleen", "Enlarged liver", "Jaundice at (or shortly after) birth", "Learning difficulties and intellectual decline", "Seizures", "Slurred, irregular speech", "Sudden loss of muscle tone which may lead to falls", "Tremors", "Trouble moving the eyes up and down", "Unsteady gait, clumsiness, walking problems "], "Exams and Tests": "A blood or bone marrow test can be done to diagnose\u00a0types A and B. The test can tell who has the disease, but does not show if you are a carrier. DNA tests can be done to diagnose carriers of\u00a0 types\u00a0A and B.A skin biopsy is usually done to diagnose types C and D. The health care provider watches\u00a0how the skin cells grow, move,\u00a0and store cholesterol. DNA tests may also be done to look for the\u00a02 genes that cause this type of the disease.Other tests might include:Bone marrow aspiration, Liver biopsy (usually not needed), Slit-lamp eye exam, Sphingomyelinase assays . ", "Treatment": "At this time, there is no effective treatment for type A.Bone marrow transplants have been done on a few patients with type B with encouraging results. Researchers continue to study possible treatments, including enzyme replacement and gene therapy.There is no specific treatment for type D.\u00a0A new\u00a0medicine called miglustat is available for the nervous system symptoms of type C.A healthy, low-cholesterol diet is recommended. However,\u00a0research does not show that these methods stop the disease from getting worse or change how cells break down cholesterol. However, medicines are available to control or relieve many symptoms, such as\u00a0sudden loss of muscle tone\u00a0and seizures.", "Causes": "Niemann-Pick disease types A and B occur when cells in the body do not have an enzyme called acid sphingomyelinase (ASM).\u00a0This\u00a0substance\u00a0helps break down (metabolize) a fatty substance called sphingomyelin, which is found in every cell in the body.If ASM is missing or does not work properly, sphingomyelin builds up inside cells. This kills your cells and makes it hard for organs to work properly. Type A occurs in all races and ethnicities. It is more common\u00a0in the Ashkenazi (Eastern European) Jewish population.Type C occurs when the body cannot properly break down cholesterol and other fats (lipids). This leads to too much cholesterol in the liver and spleen and too much of other lipids in the brain. Type C is most common among Puerto Ricans of Spanish descent.Type D involves a defect that interferes with how cholesterol moves between brain cells. It is\u00a0a variant of type C. This type has only been seen in\u00a0French Canadian people in\u00a0Yarmouth County, Nova Scotia.", "Prevention": "All types of Niemann-Pick are autosomal recessive. This means that both parents are carriers each carry\u00a01 copy of the abnormal gene without having any signs of the disease themselves.When both parents are carriers, there is a 25% chance that their child will have the disease and a 50% chance that\u00a0their child will be a carrier.Carrier detection testing is only possible if the genetic defect is identified. The defects involved in types A and B have been well-studied. DNA tests for these forms of Niemann-Pick are available.Genetic defects have been identified in the DNA of many patients with type C. It may be possible to diagnose people who carry the abnormal gene.A few centers offer tests to diagnose a baby still in the womb."}, "Nursemaid\u2019s elbow": {"description": "The injury is also called radial head dislocation.", "Possible Complications": "In some cases, children may have problems that limit movement of their arm.", "Symptoms": ["The child usually begins crying right away and refuses to use the arm because of elbow pain.", "The child may hold the arm slightly bent (flexed) at the elbow and pressed up against their belly (abdominal) area.", "The child will move the shoulder, but not the elbow. Some children stop crying as the first pain goes away, but continue to refuse to move their elbow. "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will examine the child.The child will be unable to rotate the arm at the elbow. The palm\u00a0will be\u00a0up,\u00a0and the child will have trouble bending (flexing) the elbow all the way.", "Treatment": "Sometimes the elbow will slip back into place on its own. Even then, it is best for the child to see a health care provider.DO NOT try to straighten the arm or change its position. Apply an ice pack to the elbow. Keep the areas above and below the injured elbow (including the shoulder and wrist) from moving, if possible.Take the child to your health care provider's office or an emergency room.Your provider will fix the dislocation by gently flexing the elbow and rotating the forearm so that the palm faces upward. DO NOT try to do this yourself because you may harm the child.When nursemaid's elbow returns several times, your provider may teach you how to correct the problem yourself. See your provider for help.", "Causes": "Nursemaid's elbow is a common condition in young children. It generally affects children under age 5. The injury occurs when a child is pulled up too hard by their hand or wrist. It is often seen after someone lifts a child up by one arm (for example, when trying to lift the child over a curb or high step).Other ways this injury may happen include:Stopping a fall with the arm, Rolling over in an unusual way, Swinging a young child from their arms while playing . Once the elbow dislocates, it is likely to do so again, especially in the 3 or 4 weeks after the injury.Nursemaid's elbow does not usually occur after age 5. By this time, a child's joints and the structures around it are stronger, and the child is less likely to be in a situation where this injury might occur. In some cases, the injury can happen in older children or adults, but it usually occurs with a fracture of the forearm.", "Prevention": "DO NOT lift a child by a single arm, such as from their wrist or hand. Lift from under the arms, from the upper arm, or from both arms. DO NOT swing children by their hands or forearms. To swing a young child in circles, provide support under their arms and hold their upper body next to yours."}, "Neurofibromatosis 2": {"Symptoms": ["Balance problems", "Cataracts at a young age", "Changes in vision", "Coffee-colored marks on the skin (caf\u00e9-au-lait)", "Headaches", "Hearing loss", "Ringing and noises in the ears", "Weakness of the face"], "Exams and Tests": "Signs include:Brain and spinal tumors, Hearing-related (acoustic) tumors, Skin tumors. Tests include:Genetic testing, Medical history, MRI, Physical examination. ", "description": "Although it has a similar name to neurofibromatosis type 1, it is a different and separate condition.", "Causes": "NF2 is passed down through families in an autosomal dominant pattern. This means that if one parent has NF2, any child of that parent has a 50% chance of inheriting the condition.The main risk factor is having a family history of the condition.", "Treatment": "Acoustic neuromas can be observed, or treated with surgery or radiation.Patients may benefit from genetic counseling.Every year, patients with NF2 should be evaluated with: MRI of the brain and spinal cord, Hearing and speech evaluation, Eye exam. "}, "Narcissistic personality disorder": {"description": "Narcissistic personality disorder is a condition in which people have an\u00a0excessive sense of self-importance, an extreme preoccupation with themselves, and lack of empathy for others.", "Possible Complications": "Alcohol or other drug dependence, Relationship, work, and family problems . ", "Symptoms": ["React to criticism with rage, shame, or humiliation", "Take advantage of other people to achieve his or her own goals", "Have excessive feelings of self-importance", "Exaggerate achievements and talents", "Be preoccupied with fantasies of success, power, beauty, intelligence, or ideal love", "Have unreasonable expectations of favorable treatment", "Need constant attention and admiration", "Disregard the feelings of others, and have little ability to feel empathy", "Have obsessive self-interest", "Pursue mainly selfish goals"], "Exams and Tests": "Narcissistic personality disorder is diagnosed based on a psychological evaluation\u00a0that assesses\u00a0the history and severity of the symptoms.", "Treatment": "Talk therapy may help the affected person relate to other people in a more positive and compassionate way.", "Causes": "Cause of this disorder\u00a0is unknown. Early life experiences, such as particularly insensitive parenting, are thought to play a role in the development of this disorder."}, "Nummular eczema": {"description": "Nummular eczema is an allergy\u00a0disorder in which itchy, coin-shaped spots or patches appear on the skin.", "Possible Complications": "A secondary infection of the skin may develop.", "Symptoms": ["Coin-shaped skin lesions that appear on the arms and legs", "Lesions may spread to middle of body", "Lesions may ooze and become crusty", "Itching", "Scaly or raw skin", "Skin redness or inflammation"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor can usually diagnose this condition by looking at your skin and asking about your family's medical history.A skin biopsy may be needed to rule out other similar conditions.", "Treatment": "Avoid triggers that can make your symptoms worse, such as wool, lanolin, and certain foods. Do not take frequent baths. Excess bathing and soap can cause dry skin, which often makes the condition worse. Also, avoid hot water while taking a bath or shower.Your doctor may recommend skin lotion, special soap, or moist bandages to soothe scaly, dry, or healing areas. Antihistamines may be prescribed\u00a0to\u00a0relieve itching.Persons with severe symptoms may be\u00a0prescribed ointments that contain tar, corticosteroids,\u00a0or other medicines that lower the immune system. In very severe cases, more powerful corticosteroids are prescribed..", "Causes": "The cause of nummular eczema is unknown. But\u00a0there usually is a personal or family history of:Allergies, Asthma, Atopic dermatitis. Things that can make the condition worse, include:Dry skin, Environmental irritants, Stress, Temperature changes. ", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent the disorder. Avoid any triggers that make your symptoms worse."}, "Neuropathy secondary to drugs": {"description": "Neuropathy secondary to drugs is a loss of sensation or movement in a part of the body due to nerve damage from a certain medicine.", "Possible Complications": "Inability to function at work or home because of permanent loss of sensation, Pain with tingling in the area of the nerve injury, Permanent loss of sensation (or rarely, movement) in an area. ", "Symptoms": ["Numbness, loss of sensation", "Tingling, abnormal sensations", "Weakness"], "Exams and Tests": "A brain and nervous system examination will be done.Other tests include: Blood tests to check levels of the medication (even normal blood levels of certain drugs may be toxic in elderly or certain other persons), EMG and nerve conduction test of the electrical activity of nerves and muscles. ", "Treatment": "Treatment is based on the symptoms and how severe they are. The medication causing the neuropathy may be stopped, reduced in dose, or changed to another medication. (Never change any medication without first talking to your health care provider).The following medications may be used to control pain:Over-the-counter pain relievers may be helpful for mild pain (neuralgia)., Phenytoin, carbamazepine, gabapentin, pregabalin, duloxetine, or tricyclic antidepressants such as nortriptyline may reduce the stabbing pains some people experience., Opiate pain relievers, such as morphine or fentanyl, may be needed to control severe pain.. Whenever possible, avoid or reduce medication use to lessen the risk of side effects.If you have lost sensation, you may need to take safety measures to avoid injury. ", "Causes": "The damage is caused by the toxic effects of certain medications on the peripheral nerves (nerves that are not in the brain or spinal cord). There may be damage to the axon part of the nerve cell, which interferes with nerve signals.Most commonly, many nerves are involved (polyneuropathy). This usually causes sensation changes that begin in the outside parts of the body (distal) and move toward the center of the body (proximal). There may also be changes in movement, such as weakness.Many medications may affect the development of neuropathy, including:Heart or blood pressure medications \r\n\r\nAmiodarone, Hydralazine, Perhexiline. , Drugs used to fight cancerCisplatin, Docetaxel, Paclitaxel, Suramin, Vincristine. , Drugs used to fight infections \r\n\r\nChloroquine, Isoniazid (INH) -- used against tuberculosis, Metronidazole (Flagyl), Nitrofurantoin, Thalidomide (used to fight leprosy) . , Drugs used to treat autoimmune disease \r\n\r\nEtanercept, Infliximab, Leflunomide. , Drugs used to treat skin conditions (Dapsone), Anticonvulsants (phenytoin), Anti-alcohol drugs (disulfiram), Drugs to fight HIV \r\n\r\nDidanosine (Videx), Stavudine (Zerit), Zalcitabine (Hivid) . , Arsenic, Colchicine, Gold. ", "Prevention": "Your health care provider will closely monitor your treatment with any medication that may cause neuropathy. The goal is to keep the proper blood level of medication needed to control the disease and its symptoms while preventing the medication from reaching toxic levels."}, "Necrotizing soft tissue infection": {"description": "Necrotizing soft tissue infection is a rare but very severe type of bacterial infection. It can\u00a0destroy the muscles, skin, and underlying tissue. The word \"necrotizing\" refers to something that causes body tissue to die.", "Possible Complications": "Infection spreads throughout body, causing a blood infection (sepsis), which can be deadly, Scarring\u00a0and disfigurement, Loss of your ability to use an arm or leg, Death . ", "Symptoms": ["Small, red, painful lump or bump on the skin", "Changes to a very painful bruise-like area and grows rapidly, sometimes in less than an hour", "The center may become black and die", "The skin may break open and ooze fluid", "Feeling ill", "Fever", "Sweating", "Chills", "Nausea", "Dizziness", "Weakness", "Shock"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor or nurse may diagnose this condition by looking at your skin. You may be diagnosed in an operating room by a surgeon. Tests that may be done include:CT scan, Blood tests, Skin tissue biopsy. ", "Treatment": "Immediate treatment is needed to prevent death. Treatment includes:Powerful, broad-spectrum antibiotics\u00a0given immediately through a vein (IV), Surgery to drain the sore and remove dead tissue, Special medicines called\u00a0donor immunoglobulins (antibodies) to help fight the infection in some cases. Other treatments may include: Skin grafts after the infection goes away to help your skin heal and\u00a0look better, Amputation if the disease spreads through an arm or leg, 100% oxygen at high pressure (hyperbaric oxygen therapy) for certain types of bacterial infections . ", "Causes": "Many different types of bacteria can cause this infection. A very severe and usually deadly form of necrotizing soft tissue infection is due to Streptococcus pyogenes, which is sometimes called \"flesh-eating bacteria.\"Necrotizing soft tissue infection develops when the bacteria enters the body, usually through a minor cut or scrape. The bacteria begins to grow and release harmful substances (toxins) that kill tissue and affect blood flow to the area. As the tissue dies, the bacteria enters the blood and rapidly spreads throughout the body. ", "Prevention": "Always clean the skin thoroughly after a cut, scrape, or other skin injury."}, "Nerve damage from diabetes - self-care": {"Symptoms": ["Not notice when you step on something sharp", "Not know you have a blister or small wound", "Not notice when you touch something too hot or too cold", "Feeling full after eating only a small amount of food", "Heartburn and bloating", "Nausea, constipation, or diarrhea", "Swallowing problems", "Throwing up undigested food several hours after a meal", "Light-headedness, or even fainting, when sitting or standing up", "Rapid heart rate", "Sexual problems. Men may have problems with erections. Women may have trouble with vaginal dryness or orgasm.", "Not being able to tell when your blood sugar gets too low", "Bladder problems. You may leak urine. You may not be able to tell when your bladder is full. Some people are not able to empty their bladder.", "Sweating too much -- when the temperature is cool, when you are at rest, or at other unusual times"], "description": "The nerve damage can cause many different problems in your body."}, "Neurosarcoidosis": {"description": "Neurosarcoidosis is a complication of sarcoidosis, in which inflammation occurs in the brain, spinal cord, and other areas of the nervous system.", "Possible Complications": "Complications vary depending on which part of the nervous system is involved and how you respond to treatment. Slowly worsening or permanent loss of neurological function is possible. In rare cases, the brainstem may be involved. This is life threatening.", "Symptoms": ["Changes in menstrual periods", "Excessive tiredness or fatigue", "Excessive thirst", "High urine output", "Confusion, disorientation", "Decreased hearing", "Dementia", "Delirium", "Dizziness, vertigo,\u00a0or abnormal sensations of movement", "Double vision or other vision problems", "Facial palsy (weakness, drooping)", "Headache", "Loss of sense of smell", "Loss of sense of taste, abnormal tastes", "Psychiatric disturbances", "Seizures", "Speech impairment ", "Abnormal sensations in any body part", "Loss of movement of any body part", "Loss of sensation in any body part", "Weakness of any body part "], "Exams and Tests": "An exam may show problems with one or more nerves.A history of sarcoidosis followed by nerve-related symptoms highly suggests neurosarcoidosis. However, symptoms of the condition can mimic other medical disorders, including diabetes insipidus, hypopituitarism, optic neuritis, meningitis, and certain tumors. Sometimes, the nervous system can be affected before a person is known to have sarcoid, or without affecting the lungs or other organs at all.Blood tests are not very helpful in diagnosing the condition. A lumbar puncture may show signs of inflammation. Increased levels of angiotensin-converting enzyme may be found in the blood or cerebrospinal fluid (CSF). However, this is not a reliable diagnostic test.MRI of the brain may be helpful. A chest x-ray often reveals signs of sarcoidosis of the lungs. Nerve biopsy of affected nerve tissue confirms the disorder.", "Treatment": "There is no known cure for sarcoidosis. Treatment is given if symptoms are severe or are getting worse. The goal of treatment is to reduce symptoms.Corticosteroids such as prednisone are prescribed to reduce inflammation. They are often prescribed until symptoms get better or go away. You may need to take the medicines for months, or even years.Other medications may include hormone replacement and medicines that suppress the immune system.If you have numbness, weakness, vision or hearing problems, or other problems due to damage of the nerves in the head, you may need physical therapy, braces, a cane, or a walker.Psychiatric disorders or dementia may require medication for depression, safety interventions, and assistance with care.", "Causes": "Sarcoidosis is a long-term disorder that affects many parts of the body, mostly the lungs. In a small number of patients, the disease involves some part of the nervous system. This is called neurosarcoidosis.Neurosarcoidosis may affect any part of the nervous system. Sudden, facial weakness (facial palsy) is a common neurological symptom\u00a0that involves the nerves to the muscles of the face. Any other nerve in the skull can be affected, including those in the eye and those that control taste, smell, or hearing.The spinal cord is another part of the nervous system that sarcoid can affect. People may have weakness in their arms and legs, and difficulty walking or controlling their urine.The condition can also affect the parts of the brain involved in regulating many body functions, such as temperature, sleep, and stress responses.Muscle weakness or sensory losses can occur with peripheral nerve involvement. Other areas of the brain, including the pituitary gland at the base of the brain, or the spinal cord may also be involved.", "Prevention": "Aggressive treatment of sarcoidosis turns off the body's faulty immune response before your nerves become damaged. This may reduce the chance that neurological symptoms will occur."}, "Nail polish poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Increased need to urinate", "Eye irritation and possible eye damage ", "Nausea", "Vomiting", "Abdominal pain", "Chest pain", "Irregular heartbeat ", "Difficulty breathing", "Slowed breathing rate", "Shortness of breath", "Drowsiness", "Balance problems", "Coma", "Euphoria (high feeling)", "Hallucinations", "Headache", "Seizures", "Stupor (confusion, decreased level of consciousness)", "Walking problems"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Normal pressure hydrocephalus": {"description": "Normal pressure hydrocephalus (NPH) is a rise in cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) in the brain that affects brain function. However, the pressure of the fluid is usually normal.", "Possible Complications": "Complications of surgery (infection, bleeding, shunt that does not work well), Loss of brain function (dementia) that becomes worse over time, Injury from falls, Shortened life span . ", "Symptoms": ["Changes in the way a person walks: difficulty when beginning to walk (gait apraxia), feet held wider apart than normal, shuffling of the feet, unsteadiness", "Slowing of mental function: forgetfulness, difficulty paying attention, apathy or no mood", "Problems controlling urine (urinary incontinence), and sometimes controlling stools (fecal incontinence)"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical examination and ask about the symptoms. If you have NPH, the doctor will likely find that your walking (gait) is not normal. You may also have memory problems. Tests that may be done include:Lumbar puncture (spinal tap) with careful testing of walking before and after the spinal tap, Head CT scan or MRI of the head. ", "Treatment": "Treatment for NPH is usually surgery to place a tube called a shunt that routes the excess CSF out of the brain ventricles. This is called a ventricoperitoneal shunt.", "Causes": "There is no known cause for NPH. But the chance of developing NPH is high in someone who has had any of the following:Bleeding from a blood vessel or aneurysm in the brain (subarachnoid hemorrhage), Certain head injuries, Meningitis or similar infections, Surgery on the brain (craniotomy). As CSF fluid builds up in the brain, the fluid-filled chambers (ventricles) of the brain swell. This causes pressure on brain tissue. This can damage or destroy parts of the brain."}, "Neuralgia": {"description": "Common neuralgias include:", "Possible Complications": "Complications of surgery, Disability caused by pain, Side effects of medications used to control pain, Unnecessary dental procedures before neuralgia is diagnosed. ", "Symptoms": ["Increased sensitivity of the skin along the path of the damaged nerve, so that any touch or pressure is felt as pain", "Pain along the path of the nerve that is sharp or stabbing, in the same location each episode, comes and goes (intermittent) or is constant and burning, and may get worse when the area is moved", "Weakness or complete paralysis of muscles supplied by the same nerve "], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor or nurse will examine you and ask questions about your medical history and symptoms,\u00a0including:When did the pain start? , Did\u00a0you injure yourself recently?\u00a0, Have you had any health changes?. The exam may show:Abnormal sensation in the skin, Reflex problems, Loss of muscle mass, Lack of sweating (sweating is controlled by nerves), Tenderness along a nerve, often in the lower face and jaw and rarely in the temple and forehead, Trigger points (areas where even a slight touch triggers pain). You may also need to see a dentist if the pain is\u00a0in your face or jaw. A dental exam can rule out dental disorders that may cause facial pain (such as a tooth abscess). Other symptoms (such as redness or swelling) may help rule out conditions such as infections, bone fractures, or rheumatoid arthritis.There are no specific tests for neuralgia, but the following tests may be done to find the cause of the pain:Blood tests to check blood sugar, kidney function, and other possible causes of neuralgia, Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), Nerve conduction study with electromyography, Ultrasound\r\n , Spinal tap (lumbar puncture). ", "Treatment": "Your doctor will: Discuss ways to reverse or control the cause of the nerve problem (if found), Recommend pain medicines . Treatment varies depending on many things, including the cause, location, and severity of the pain. Strict control of blood sugar may speed recovery in people with diabetes who develop neuralgia.Medications to control pain may include:Antidepressant medications (amitriptyline, nortriptyline, or duloxetine), Antiseizure medications (carbamazepine, gabapentin, lamotrigine, phenytoin, or pregabalin), Over-the-counter pain medicines (aspirin, acetaminophen, or ibuprofen), Narcotic analgesics (hydrocodone) for short-term relief of severe pain (however, these do not always work well), Lidocaine patch, Skin creams containing capsaicin or lidocaine. Other treatments may include:Shots with pain-relieving (anesthetic) drugs, Nerve blocks, Physical therapy (may be needed for some types of neuralgia, especially postherpetic neuralgia), Procedures to reduce feeling in the nerve (such as nerve ablation using radiofrequency, heat, balloon compression, or injection of chemicals), Surgery to take pressure off a nerve, Alternative therapy, such as acupuncture or biofeedback. Unfortunately, procedures may not improve symptoms and can cause loss of feeling or abnormal sensations.When other treatment methods fail, doctors may try nerve or spinal cord stimulation, or more rarely a procedure called motor cortex stimulation (MCS). An electrode is placed over part of nerve, spinal cord, or brain and is hooked to a pulse generator under the skin. This changes how your nerves signal and it may reduce pain.", "Causes": "Causes of neuralgia include:Chemical irritation, Chronic renal insufficiency, Diabetes, Infections, such as herpes zoster (shingles), HIV, Lyme disease, and syphilis, Medications such as cisplatin, paclitaxel, or vincristine, Porphyria, Pressure on nerves by nearby bones, ligaments, blood vessels, or tumors, Trauma (including surgery) . In many cases, the cause is unknown.Postherpetic neuralgia and trigeminal neuralgia are the two most common forms of neuralgia. A related but less common neuralgia affects the glossopharyngeal nerve, which provides feeling to the throat.Neuralgia is more common in elderly people, but it may occur at any age.", "Prevention": "Treating related disorders such as diabetes and renal insufficiency may prevent some neuralgias. Strict control of blood sugar may prevent nerve damage in people with diabetes. In the case of shingles, there is some evidence that antiviral drugs and a herpes zoster virus vaccine can prevent neuralgia."}, "Neurosyphilis": {"description": "Neurosyphilis is an infection of the brain or spinal cord. It usually occurs in persons who have had untreated syphilis for many years.", "Possible Complications": "The symptoms can get slowly worse.", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal walk (gait)", "Blindness", "Confusion", "Dementia", "Depression", "Headache", "Incontinence", "Inability to walk", "Irritability", "Numbness in the toes, feet, or legs", "Poor concentration", "Seizures", "Stiff neck", "Tremors", "Visual disturbances", "Weakness"], "Exams and Tests": "Signs include:Abnormal reflexes, Muscle atrophy, Muscle contractions. Blood tests can be done to detect substances produced by the bacteria that cause syphilis. The oldest test is the VDRL test.Other tests include:Fluorescent treponemal antibody absorption (FTA-ABS), Rapid plasma reagin (RPR), Treponema pallidum particle agglutination assay (TPPA). In neurosyphilis, it is important to test the spinal fluid for signs of syphilis.Tests to look for problems with the nervous system may include:Cerebral angiogram, Head CT scan, Lumbar puncture (\"spinal tap\") and a cerebrospinal fluid analysis (CSF fluid analysis), MRI scan of the brain, brainstem, or spinal cord. ", "Treatment": "Penicillin is used to treat neurosyphilis. The medicine may be given in various ways.It may be injected into a vein several times a day for 10 - 14 days., You may take probenecid by mouth 4 times a day, combined with daily muscle injections -- both for 10 - 14 days.. You must have follow-up blood tests at 3, 6, 12, 24, and 36 months to make sure the infection is gone. You will need follow-up lumbar punctures for CSF fluid analysis every 6 months. If you have HIV or another medical condition, your follow-up schedule may be different.For information on treating syphilis, see: Syphilis.", "Causes": "Neurosyphilis is caused by Treponema pallidum, the bacteria that cause syphilis. It usually occurs about 10 - 20 years after a person is first infected with syphilis. Not everyone who has syphilis will develop this complication.There are four different forms of neurosyphilis:Asymptomatic (most common form), General paresis, Meningovascular, Tabes dorsalis. Asymptomatic neurosyphilis occurs before symptomatic syphilis.", "Prevention": "Prompt diagnosis and treatment of the original syphilis infection can prevent neurosyphilis."}, "Nipple discharge": {"description": "Nipple discharge is any fluid that comes out of the nipple area in your breast.", "Possible Complications": "Nipple discharge may be a symptom of breast cancer or a pituitary tumor.Skin changes around the nipple may be caused by Paget's disease.", "Symptoms": ["Bloody", "Comes from only 1 nipple", "Comes out on its own without you squeezing or touching your nipple ", "Comes out of both nipples", "Happens when you squeeze your nipples "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will examine you and ask questions about your symptoms and medical history.Tests that may be done include:Prolactin blood test, Thyroid blood tests, Head CT scan or MRI to look for pituitary tumor, Mammography, Ultrasound of the breast, Breast biopsy, Ductography or ductogram, an x-ray with contrast dye injected into the affected milk duct, Skin biopsy, if Paget's disease is a concern . ", "Treatment": "Once the cause of your nipple discharge is found, your doctor or nurse can recommend ways to treat it. You may:Need to change any medicine that caused the discharge, Have lumps removed, Have all or some of the breast ducts removed, Receive creams to treat skin changes around your nipple, Receive medicines to treat a\u00a0health condition . If all of your tests are normal, you may not need treatment. You should have another mammogram and physical exam within 1 year.", "Causes": "Sometimes discharge from your nipples is okay and will get better on its own. You are more likely to have nipple discharge if you have been pregnant at least once.Nipple discharge is usually not cancer (benign), but rarely it can be a sign of breast cancer. It is important to find out what is causing it and to get treatment. Here are some reasons for nipple discharge:Pregnancy, Recent breastfeeding, Rubbing on the area from a bra or t-shirt, Injury to the breast, Infection, Inflammation and clogging of the breast ducts, Noncancerous pituitary tumors, Small growth in the breast that is usually not cancer, Severe underactive thyroid gland (hypothyroidism), Fibrocystic breast (normal lumpiness in the breast), Use of certain medicines, Use of certain herbs, such as anise and fennel, Widening of the milk ducts . Sometimes, babies can have nipple discharge. This is caused by hormones from the mother before birth. It should go away in 2 weeks.Cancers such as Paget\u2019s disease (a rare type of cancer involving the skin of the nipple) can also cause nipple discharge."}, "Nitric acid poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain - severe", "Burns to skin or mouth", "Fever", "Mouth pain - severe", "Rapid drop in blood pressure", "Throat swelling, which leads to breathing difficulty", "Throat pain - severe", "Vomiting, bloody", "Bluish colored lips and fingernails", "Chest tightness", "Choking", "Coughing", "Coughing up blood", "Dizziness", "Low blood pressure", "Rapid pulse", "Shortness of breath", "Weakness"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a local poison control center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Neurofibromatosis-1": {"description": "Neurofibromatosis-1 is an inherited disorder in which nerve tissue tumors (neurofibromas) form in the: ", "Possible Complications": "Attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD), Blindness caused by a tumor in an optic nerve (optic glioma), Break in the leg bones that does not heal well, Cancerous tumors, Loss of function in nerves that a neurofibroma has put pressure on over the long term, Pheochromocytoma, which causes very high blood pressure, Regrowth of NF tumors, Scoliosis, or curvature of the spine, Tumors of the face, skin, and other exposed areas. ", "Symptoms": ["Blindness", "Convulsions", "Freckles in the underarm or groin", "Large, soft tumors called plexiform neurofibromas, which may have a dark color and may spread under the surface of the skin", "Pain (from affected nerves)", "Small, rubbery tumors of the skin called nodular neurofibromas "], "Exams and Tests": "A doctor who treats NF1 will diagnose this condition. The doctor may be a:Dermatologist, Developmental pediatrician, Geneticist, Neurologist . The diagnosis will usually be made based on the unique symptoms and signs of neurofibromatosis.Signs include:Colored, raised spots (Lisch nodules) on the colored part (iris) of the eye, Fracture of the long bones of the leg in early childhood, Freckling in the armpits, groin, or underneath the breast in women, Large tumors under the skin (plexiform neurofibromas), which can affect the appearance and put pressure on nearby nerves or organs, Many soft tumors on the skin or deeper in the body, Mild cognitive impairment, attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD), learning disorders . Tests may include:Eye exam by an ophthalmologist familiar with NF1, Genetic tests to find a change (mutation) in the neurofibromin gene, MRI of the brain or other affected sites, Other tests for complications . ", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for neurofibromatosis. Tumors that cause pain or loss of function may be removed. Tumors that have grown quickly should be removed promptly as they may become cancerous (malignant). Experimental treatments for severe tumors are under investigation.Some children with learning disorders may need special schooling.", "Causes": "NF1 is an inherited disease. If either parent has NF1, each of their children has a 50% chance of having the disease.NF1 also appears in families with no history of the condition. In these cases, it is caused by a new gene change (mutation) in the sperm or egg. NF1 is caused by problems with a gene for a protein called neurofibromin.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is recommended for anyone with a family history of neurofibromatosis.Annual eye, skin, back, nervous system (neurological)\u00a0exams, and blood pressure monitoring\u00a0are strongly recommended."}, "Nasal septal hematoma": {"description": "A nasal septal hematoma is collection of blood within the septum of the nose. The septum is the part of the nose between the two nostrils. An injury disrupts the blood vessels so that fluid and blood may collect under the lining.", "Possible Complications": "If you have had the hematoma for a long time, it may become infected and will be painful. You may develop a septal abscess and fever.An untreated septal hematoma may lead to a hole in the area separating the two nostrils. This can cause nasal congestion. Or, the area may collapse, leading to a deformity called a saddle nose.", "Symptoms": ["Blockage in breathing", "Nasal congestion", "Painful swelling of the nasal septum", "Change in the shape of the nose"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will look into your nose to see if there is swelling of the tissue between the nostrils. The health care provider will touch the area with an applicator or a cotton swab. If there is a hematoma, The area will be soft and able to be pressed down. The nasal septum is normally thin and rigid.", "Treatment": "Your health care provider will make a small cut to drain the blood. Gauze or cotton will be placed inside the nose after the blood is removed.", "Causes": "A septal hematoma can be caused by:A broken nose , Injury to the soft tissue of the area, Surgery. The problem is more common in children because their septums are thicker and have a more flexible lining. ", "Prevention": "Recognizing and treating the problem early can prevent complications and allow the septum to heal."}, "Nevoid basal cell carcinoma syndrome": {"description": "It causes an unusual facial appearance and a higher risk of skin cancers.", "Possible Complications": "Persons with this condition may develop:Blindness, Brain tumor, Deafness, Fractures, Ovarian tumors, Skin damage and severe scarring due to skin cancers . ", "Symptoms": ["Broad nose", "Cleft palate", "Heavy, protruding brow", "Jaw that sticks out (in some cases)", "Wide-set eyes ", "Blindness", "Deafness", "Intellectual disability", "Seizures", "Curvature of the back (scoliosis)", "Severe curvature of the back (kyphosis) "], "Exams and Tests": "There may be a family history of\u00a0this disorder\u00a0and a past history of basal cell skin cancers.Tests may reveal:Brain tumors, Cysts in the jaw, which can lead to abnormal tooth development or jaw fractures, Defects in the colored part (iris) or lens of the eye, Head swelling due to fluid on the brain (hydrocephalus), Rib abnormalities. Tests that may be done include:Echocardiogram of the heart, Genetic testing (in some patients), MRI of the brain, Skin biopsy of tumors, X-rays of the bones, teeth, and skull, Ultrasound to check for ovarian tumors. ", "Treatment": "It is important to get examined by a skin doctor (dermatologist) often, so that skin cancers may be treated while they are still small.Persons with this\u00a0disorder may also be seen and treated by other specialists, depending on which part of the body is affected. For example, a cancer specialist (oncologist) may treat tumors in the body, and an orthopedic surgeon may help treat bone problems.", "Causes": "Nevoid basal cell carcinoma nevus syndrome is a rare genetic condition. The gene linked to the syndrome is known as PTCH (\"patched\").The gene is passed down through families as an autosomal dominant trait. This means you\u00a0develop the syndrome if either parent passes the gene to you.", "Prevention": "Couples with a family history of this syndrome might consider genetic counseling before becoming pregnant.Staying out of\u00a0the sun and using sunscreen can help prevent new basal cell skin cancers.Avoid radiation such as x-rays. People with this condition are very sensitive to radiation.\u00a0Exposure to radiation can lead to skin cancers."}, "Necrotizing vasculitis": {"description": "Necrotizing vasculitis is a rare condition that involves inflammation of the blood vessel walls.", "Possible Complications": "Permanent damage to the structure or function of the affected area\r\n, Secondary infections of necrotic tissues. ", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal skin tissue (lesions) \r\nPapules (small, solid, and raised lesions), Red or purple colored, Located on the legs, hands, or other parts of the body . ", "Papules (small, solid, and raised lesions)", "Red or purple colored", "Located on the legs, hands, or other parts of the body ", "Fingers that change color (blue fingers or toes)", "Tissue death due to lack of oxygen \r\nPain or tenderness in the area, Skin redness, Sores (ulcers) that do not heal . ", "Pain or tenderness in the area", "Skin redness", "Sores (ulcers) that do not heal ", "Joint pain", "Leg pain", "Muscle contractions", "Wasting away of muscles", "Pain, numbness, tingling in an arm, leg, or other body area", "Weakness of an arm, leg, or other body area", "Pupils that are different sizes", "Eyelid drooping", "Swallowing difficulty", "Speech impairment", "Movement difficulty ", "Cough", "Shortness of breath", "Sinus and congestion pain", "Abdominal pain", "Blood in the urine or stools", "Painful menstruation", "Hoarseness or changing voice", "Symptoms related to damage of the arteries that supply the heart (coronary arteries) "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam. A nervous system (neurological) examination may show signs of nerve damage.Tests that may be done include:Biopsy of the muscle, organ, tissue, or nerve biopsy, Chest x-ray, C-reactive protein test, Sedimentation rate, Urinalysis, Hepatitis blood test, Blood test for antibodies against neutrophils (ANCA antibodies) or nuclear antigens (ANA). ", "Treatment": "Corticosteroids are given in most cases. The dose will depend on how bad the condition is. Other drugs that suppress the immune system may reduce inflammation of the blood vessels.For severe disease, cyclophosphamide (Cytoxan) is usually given. A new medicine, rituximab, (Rituxan) may be used instead of Cytoxan.Related conditions include:Henoch-Schonlein purpura, Kawasaki disease, Polyarteritis nodosa, Granulomatosis with polyangiitis. ", "Causes": "Necrotizing vasculitis is common with:Polyarteritis nodosa, Rheumatoid arthritis, Scleroderma, Systemic lupus erythematosus, Granulomatosis with polyangiitis (formerly called Wegener's granulomatosis) . It is very rare in children.The cause of the inflammation is unknown. It is likely related to autoimmune factors. The wall of the blood vessel may scar and thicken, or die (become necrotic). The blood vessel may close, interrupting blood flow to the tissues it supplies. The lack of blood flow will cause the tissues to die.Necrotizing vasculitis may affect any blood vessel in the body. Therefore, it can cause problems with the skin or any of the body's organs.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent this disorder."}}